Maryland, session 2026, HB1443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–317 and 7–707 of Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(l–1) (1) “Energy salesperson” means an individual who is licensed by the
Commission to sell:
(i) electricity or electricity supply services to residential retail
electric customers on behalf of an electricity supplier as an employee or agent of the
electricity supplier; or
(ii) gas or gas supply services to residential retail gas customers on
behalf of a gas supplier as an employee or agent of the gas supplier.
(2) “Energy salesperson” does not include:
(i) the Department of General Services when the Department of
General Services sells energy under § 7–704.4 of this article;

HOUSE BILL 1443 3
(ii) the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission when the
Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission sells energy under Division II of this article;
(iii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this article; or
(iv) an employee or contractor of an electric company when the
employee or contractor is performing duties specific to standard offer service.]
[(l–2)] (L–1) “Energy vendor” means a person that has a contract or subcontract to
provide energy sales services to an electricity supplier or a gas supplier that provides
electricity supply services or gas supply services, respectively, to a residential customer.
7–310.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Education and Protection Fund.
(b) There is an Education and Protection Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide resources to improve the Commission’s
ability to:
(1) educate customers on:
(i) retail electric and gas choice; and
(ii) energy choices that help meet the State’s climate commitments
under § 7–319 of this subtitle and § 2–1204.2 of the Environment Article;
(2) protect customers from unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive practices
by electricity suppliers, [energy salespersons,] energy vendors, or gas suppliers; and
(3) develop a training and educational program for electricity suppliers,
gas suppliers, [energy salespersons,] and energy vendors as provided under § 7–311 of this
subtitle.
(d) The Commission shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) revenue distributed to the Fund under § 13–201(e)(3) of this article;

HOUSE BILL 1443
(2) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(3) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used only to:
(1) educate retail electric or gas customers on retail choice and energy
choices that help to meet the State’s climate commitments under § 7–319 of this subtitle
and § 2–1204.2 of the Environment Article;
(2) improve customer protections for retail electric or gas customers; and
(3) develop a training and educational program for electricity suppliers,
gas suppliers, [energy salespersons,] and energy vendors as provided under § 7–311 of this
subtitle.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the General
Fund of the State.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
7–311.
(a) The Commission shall develop a training and educational program for any
entity or individual that is licensed by the Commission as an electricity supplier, a gas
supplier, [an energy salesperson,] or an energy vendor.
(b) The Commission shall develop the program in consultation with interested
stakeholders, including electricity suppliers, gas suppliers, [energy salespersons,] and
energy vendors.
(c) The program shall require that a designated representative of each licensed
electricity supplier, licensed gas supplier, OR licensed energy vendor[, or licensed energy
salesperson] demonstrate a thorough understanding of the Commission’s regulations
regarding:
(1) sales;
(2) consumer protection; and
(3) any other matter the Commission deems appropriate.

HOUSE BILL 1443 5
(d) At the conclusion of the training, the Commission shall:
(1) conduct an examination; and
(2) on a satisfactory score, certify that the designated representative of the
licensed electricity supplier, licensed gas supplier, [licensed energy salesperson,] or
licensed energy vendor has successfully completed the training.
(e) (1) The Commission shall determine the schedule and frequency by which
a designated representative of a licensed electricity supplier, licensed gas supplier,
[licensed energy salesperson,] or licensed energy vendor must complete the training and
certification.
(2) A designated representative of a new electricity supplier, gas supplier,
[energy salesperson,] or energy vendor shall complete the training and certification prior
to the issuance of a license.
(f) The Commission may adopt regulations that include appropriate penalties or
sanctions for failure to comply with this section.
(g) (1) The Commission shall use the following funding sources for the initial
development of the training and educational program:
(i) the assessments collected in accordance with § 2–110 of this
article; or
(ii) funds deposited into the Education and Protection Fund in
accordance with § 7–310 of this subtitle.
(2) The Commission may establish reasonable fees to pay for the costs of
the program.
7–315.
(a) (1) In this section, “residential energy retailer” includes:
(i) an electricity supplier that supplies electricity to residential
retail electric customers;
(ii) a gas supplier that supplies gas to residential retail gas
customers; AND
(iii) [an energy salesperson; and
(iv)] an energy vendor.

HOUSE BILL 1443
(2) “Residential energy retailer” does not include:
(i) the Department of General Services when the Department of
General Services sells energy under § 7–704.4 of this title;
(ii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title;
(iii) an electricity supplier when supplying electricity to commercial
retail electric customers; or
(iv) a gas supplier that supplies gas to commercial retail gas
customers.
7–321.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE ENERGY CHOICE
MULTIMEDIA PROGRAM.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN ENERGY CHOICE MULTIMEDIA
PROGRAM.
(C) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE DESIGNED TO EDUCATE RATEPAYERS AND
CONSUMERS REGARDING THE ABILITY OF THE RATEPAYERS AND CONSUMERS TO
CHOOSE THEIR ENERGY SUPPLIER.
(D) THE PROGRAM CREATED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE ANNUAL MAILING AND ONE
ANNUAL UTILITY BILL INSERT DIRECTING THE RECIPIENT TO THE COMMISSION’S
WEBSITE ON ENERGY CHOICE; AND
(2) SHALL BE CREATED WITH INPUT SOLICITED FROM THE
FOLLOWING STAKEHOLDERS:
(I) ELECTRIC COMPANIES;
(II) GAS COMPANIES;
(III) ELECTRICITY SUPPLIERS;
(IV) GAS SUPPLIERS;
(V) RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1443 7
(VI) SMALL COMMERCIAL CUSTOMERS.
7–507.
(a) A person, other than an electric company providing standard offer service
under § 7–510(c) of this subtitle, a municipal electric utility serving customers solely in its
distribution territory, the Department of General Services selling energy under § 7–704.4
of this title, or a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle, may not
engage in the business of an electricity supplier in the State unless the person holds a
license issued by the Commission.
(b) (1) An application for an electricity supplier license shall:
(i) be made to the Commission in writing on a form adopted by the
Commission;
(ii) be verified by oath or affirmation; and
(iii) contain information that the Commission requires, including:
1. proof of technical and managerial competence;
2. proof of compliance with all applicable requirements of the
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and any independent system operator or regional
or system transmission operator to be used by the licensee;
3. a certification of compliance with applicable federal and
State environmental laws and regulations that relate to the generation of electricity; and
4. payment of the applicable licensing fee.
(2) (i) The term of a residential electricity supplier license is 3 years.
(ii) The terms of licenses may be staggered as determined by the
Commission.
(iii) Unless a license for a residential electricity supplier is renewed
for a 3–year term in accordance with this subsection, the license expires on the date that
the Commission sets.
(iv) A licensee may renew a license for [a 3–year term] ADDITIONAL
TERMS before the license expires if the licensee:
1. otherwise is entitled to be licensed;

HOUSE BILL 1443
2. submits to the Commission a renewal application on the
form that the Commission provides; and
3. pays to the Commission the applicable renewal fee set by
the Commission.
(V) IF AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER SUBMITS AN APPLICATION
FOR LICENSE RENEWAL, THE ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER’S EXPIRING LICENSE SHALL
REMAIN VALID WHILE THE RENEWAL LICENSE APPLICATION IS PENDING.
(c) The Commission shall, by regulation or order:
(1) require proof of financial integrity;
(2) require a licensee to post a bond or other similar instrument if, in the
Commission’s judgment, the bond or similar instrument is necessary to insure an electricity
supplier’s financial integrity;
(3) require a licensee to:
(i) provide proof that the licensee is qualified to do business in the
State with the Department of Assessments and Taxation; and
(ii) agree to be subject to all applicable taxes; and
(4) adopt any other requirements the Commission finds to be in the public
interest, which may include different requirements for:
(i) electricity suppliers that serve only large customers; and
(ii) the different categories of electricity suppliers.
(d) A license issued under this section may not be transferred without prior
Commission approval.
(e) The Commission shall adopt regulations or issue orders to:
(1) protect consumers, electric companies, electricity suppliers, [energy
salespersons,] and energy vendors from anticompetitive and abusive practices;
(2) require each electricity supplier[, each energy salesperson,] and each
energy vendor to provide, in addition to the requirements under § 7–505(b)(5) of this
subtitle, adequate and accurate customer information to enable customers to make
informed choices regarding the purchase of any electricity services offered by the electricity
supplier;

HOUSE BILL 1443 9
(3) establish reasonable restrictions on telemarketing;
(4) establish procedures for contracting with customers;
(5) establish requirements and limitations relating to deposits, billing,
collections, and contract cancellations;
(6) establish provisions providing for the referral of a delinquent account
by an electricity supplier to the standard offer service under § 7–510(c) of this subtitle;
[and]
(7) establish procedures for dispute resolution; AND
(8) REQUIRE EACH ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER, WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER
ADDING OR REMOVING AN ENERGY VENDOR, TO SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A LIST
OF ALL ENERGY VENDORS CONDUCTING SALES ACTIVITIES ON BEHALF OF THE
ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER.
(f) In accordance with regulations or orders of the Commission, electricity bills,
for competitive and regulated electric services, provided to consumers may provide, in
addition to the requirements of § 7–505(b)(5) of this subtitle and subsection (e)(2) of this
section, the following information:
(1) the identity and phone number of the electricity supplier of the service;
(2) sufficient information to evaluate prices and services; and
(3) information identifying whether the price is regulated or competitive.
(g) (1) An electricity supplier, [an energy salesperson,] an energy vendor, or
any person or governmental unit may not, without first obtaining the customer’s
permission:
(i) make any change in the electricity supplier for a customer; or
(ii) add a new charge for a new or existing service or option.
(2) The Commission shall adopt regulations or issue orders establishing
procedures to prevent the practices prohibited under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(h) (1) An electricity supplier[, an energy salesperson,] or an energy vendor
may not discriminate against any customer based wholly or partly on race, color, creed,
national origin, gender identity, disability, sexual orientation, or sex of an applicant for
service or for any arbitrary, capricious, or unfairly discriminatory reason.

HOUSE BILL 1443
(2) An electricity supplier[, an energy salesperson,] or an energy vendor
may not refuse to provide service to a customer except by the application of standards that
are reasonably related to the electricity supplier’s economic and business purposes.
(i) An electricity supplier[, an energy salesperson,] and an energy vendor shall
be subject to all applicable federal and State environmental laws and regulations.
(j) An electricity supplier shall post on the Internet information that is readily
understandable about its services and rates for small commercial and residential electric
customers.
(k) (1) Subject to PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS subsection [(r) of this section], for
just cause on the Commission’s own investigation or on complaint of the Office of People’s
Counsel, the Attorney General, or an affected party, the Commission may:
(i) deny a license to, or revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the
license of, an electricity supplier[, an energy salesperson,] or an energy vendor;
(ii) impose a civil penalty or other remedy;
(iii) order a refund or credit to a customer; or
(iv) impose a moratorium on adding or soliciting additional
customers by the electricity supplier[, energy salesperson,] or energy vendor.
(2) A civil penalty may be imposed in addition to the Commission’s decision
to deny, revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license or impose a moratorium.
(3) Just cause includes:
(i) intentionally providing false information to the Commission;
(ii) switching, or causing to be switched, the electricity supply for a
customer without first obtaining the customer’s permission;
(iii) failing to provide electricity for its customers;
(iv) committing fraud or engaging in deceptive practices;
(v) failing to maintain financial integrity;
(vi) violating a Commission regulation or order;
(vii) failing to pay, collect, remit, or calculate accurately applicable
State or local taxes;

HOUSE BILL 1443 11
(viii) violating a provision of this article or any other applicable
consumer protection law of the State;
(ix) conviction of a felony by the licensee or principal of the licensee
or any crime involving fraud, theft, or deceit; AND
(x) denial, suspension, or revocation of or refusal to renew a license
by any State or federal authority[; and
(xi) commission of any of the acts described in items (i) through (x) of
this paragraph by a person that is an affiliate of the licensee or that is under common
control with the licensee].
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AN ELECTRICITY SUPPLIER OR
ENERGY VENDOR WITH DUE PROCESS BEFORE TAKING ANY ACTION TO SUSPEND OR
REVOKE A LICENSE.
(l) (1) An electricity supplier, an energy vendor, or any other person[, except
for an energy salesperson,] selling or offering to sell electricity in the State in violation of
this section or § 7–318 of this title, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, is subject
to:
(i) a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for the violation;
(ii) license denial, revocation, or suspension or refusal to renew the
license; or
(iii) both.
(2) [An energy salesperson selling or offering to sell electricity in the State
in violation of this section or § 7–317 of this title, after notice and an opportunity for a
hearing, is subject to license denial, revocation, or suspension or refusal to renew the
license.
(3)] Each day [or part of a day] a violation continues is a separate violation.
[(4)] (3) Each customer to whom electricity is sold or offered in violation
of this section is a separate violation.
[(5)] (4) The Commission shall determine the amount of any civil penalty
after considering:
(i) the number of previous violations of any provision of this division
by the electricity supplier, energy vendor, or other person;
(ii) the gravity of the current violation;

HOUSE BILL 1443
(iii) the good faith of the electricity supplier, energy vendor, or other
person charged in attempting to achieve compliance after notification of the violation; and
(iv) any other matter that the Commission considers appropriate and
relevant.
(m) In connection with a consumer complaint or Commission investigation under
this section or [§ 7–317 or] § 7–318 of this title, an electricity supplier, [an energy
salesperson,] energy vendor, and any other person selling or offering to sell electricity in
the State shall provide to the Commission access to any accounts, books, papers, and
documents that the Commission considers necessary to resolve the matter at issue.
(n) The Commission may order the electricity supplier, [energy salesperson,] an
energy vendor, or other person to cease adding or soliciting additional customers or to cease
serving customers in the State.
(o) The Commission shall consult with the Consumer Protection Division of the
Office of the Attorney General before issuing regulations designed to protect consumers.
(p) The People’s Counsel shall have the same authority in licensing, complaint,
and dispute resolution proceedings as it has in Title 2 of this article.
(q) Nothing in this subtitle may be construed to affect the authority of the
Division of Consumer Protection in the Office of the Attorney General to enforce violations
of Titles 13 and 14 of the Commercial Law Article or any other applicable State law or
regulation in connection with the activities of electricity suppliers[, energy salespersons,]
and energy vendors.
[(r) The Commission may not impose a civil penalty on an energy salesperson
under subsection (k) or (l) of this section.]
7–510.
(d) (1) This subsection applies to residential electricity supply other than
supply offered through:
(i) standard offer service;
(ii) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this title; or
(iii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle.
(2) A residential electricity supplier:

HOUSE BILL 1443 13
(i) [may offer electricity, other than green power, only at a price that
does not exceed the trailing 12–month average of the electric company’s standard offer
service rate in the electric company’s service territory as of the date of agreement with the
customer;
(ii) may offer residential electricity supply only for a term not to
exceed 12 months at a time;
(iii) may, for electricity supply other than green power, automatically
renew the term only if the electricity supplier provides notice to the customer 90 days before
and 30 days before renewal;
(iv) may offer green power that meets the requirements of § 7–707 of
this title, but may not automatically renew the term with the customer;
(v) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, may not offer a
variable rate other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal variation not more than twice in a
single year; and
(vi) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers] SHALL PROVIDE TWO
WRITTEN NOTICES TO RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS BEFORE THE AUTOMATIC
RENEWAL OF A FIXED DURATION ELECTRICITY SUPPLY CONTRACT;
(II) SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN NOTICE OF A CHANGE IN PRICE
ANY TIME THE PRICE INCREASES MORE THAN 10% WITHIN 30 DAYS BEFORE THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF A CONTRACT; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, MAY
NOT OFFER A VARIABLE RATE THAT ADJUSTS MORE THAN ONCE PER BILLING CYCLE.
(3) Paragraph [(2)(v)] (2)(III) of this subsection does not prohibit the offer
and use of time–of–use rates that establish different rates for periods within a single day.
(4) [A residential electricity supplier may not sell to an electric company,
and an electric company may not purchase from the electricity supplier, accounts
receivable] THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH APPROPRIATE PROTECTIONS AND
SAFEGUARDS FOR RESIDENTIAL ELECTRICITY SUPPLIERS THAT PURCHASE
ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLES.
[(f) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this title; or
(ii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1443
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, as approved by
the Commission by regulation or order, each electric company and each residential
electricity supplier shall allow a customer to indicate the customer’s intention to remain on
standard offer service indefinitely and not to receive directed marketing contacts from
electricity suppliers through the implementation of a “do not transfer” list onto which the
customer may request to be placed.
(3) A residential electricity supplier may contact a customer on a “do not
transfer” list until the electricity supply agreement entered into between the electricity
supplier and the customer expires.]
[(g)] (F) (1) In this subsection, “billing entity” means an electric company, a
licensed electricity supplier, or any other entity that is responsible for issuing an electric
bill to a residential customer.
(2) On or before the 15th day of each month, each billing entity shall submit
a report to the Commission on customer choice in its service territory for the preceding
month, including:
(i) the total kilowatt–hours distributed to customers purchasing
electricity from a third–party electricity supplier;
(ii) the total supply cost charged to customers purchasing electricity
from a third–party electricity supplier;
(iii) the total cost that customers specified in item (ii) of this
paragraph would have paid under standard offer service;
(iv) the net third–party total cost compared to the net standard offer
service cost;
(v) the total third–party average rate;
(vi) the standard offer service average rate;
(vii) the difference between the total third–party average rate and the
standard offer service average rate;
(viii) the third–party average residential rates broken out by supplier
and the variance between each of these rates and the standard offer service average rate;
(ix) the third–party average general service nondemand rates broken
out by supplier and the variance between each of these third–party rates and the standard
offer service average rate;

HOUSE BILL 1443 15
(x) the third–party average general service demand rates broken out
by supplier and the variance between each of these third–party rates and the standard offer
service average rate;
(xi) the third–party average large power demand rates broken out by
supplier and the variance between each of these third–party rates and the standard offer
service average rate; and
(xii) other pertinent information the Commission considers
appropriate.
[(h)] (G) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, adopt procedures to
implement this section.
[(i)] (H) Except as provided in § 7–510.3 of this subtitle, a county or municipal
corporation may not act as an aggregator unless the Commission determines there is not
sufficient competition within the boundaries of the county or municipal corporation.
7–602.
The General Assembly finds and declares that the purpose of this subtitle is to:
(1) clarify existing law regarding the provision of competitive retail gas
supply and gas supply services in the State;
(2) require the Commission to license gas suppliers[, energy salespersons,]
and energy vendors;
(3) authorize the Commission to adopt complaint procedures;
(4) establish certain requirements relating to the competitiveness of retail
gas supply and gas supply services markets; and
(5) establish standards for the protection of consumers.
7–603.
(a) The Commission shall license gas suppliers[, energy salespersons,] and
energy vendors and shall have the same authority as the Commission has under [§§ 7–317,
7–318,] §§ 7–318 and 7–507 of this title for electricity suppliers[, energy salespersons,]
and energy vendors, including the authority to:
(1) deny, revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license;
(2) impose a moratorium, civil penalty, or other remedy; or

HOUSE BILL 1443
(3) order a refund for or credit to a customer.
(b) The Commission shall adopt licensing requirements and procedures for gas
suppliers[, energy salespersons,] and energy vendors that protect consumers, the public
interest, and the collection of all State and local taxes, consistent with the requirements for
electricity suppliers under Subtitle 5 of this title [and energy salespersons] and energy
vendors under Subtitle 3 of this title.
7–603.1.
(a) (1) Subject to PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS subsection [(b)(5) of this section],
for just cause on the Commission’s own investigation or on complaint of the Office of
People’s Counsel, the Attorney General, or an affected party, the Commission may:
(i) deny a license to, or revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the
license of, a gas supplier[, an energy salesperson,] or an energy vendor;
(ii) impose a civil penalty or other remedy;
(iii) order a refund or credit to a customer; or
(iv) impose a moratorium on adding or soliciting additional
customers by the gas supplier[, energy salesperson,] or an energy vendor.
(2) A civil penalty may be imposed in addition to the Commission’s decision
to deny, revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license or impose a moratorium.
(3) Just cause includes:
(i) intentionally providing false information to the Commission;
(ii) switching, or causing to be switched, the gas supply for a
customer without first obtaining the customer’s permission;
(iii) failing to provide gas for its customers;
(iv) committing fraud or engaging in deceptive practices;
(v) failing to maintain financial integrity;
(vi) violating a Commission regulation or order;
(vii) failing to pay, collect, remit, or calculate accurately applicable
State or local taxes;
(viii) violating a provision of this article or any other applicable
consumer protection law of the State;

HOUSE BILL 1443 17
(ix) conviction of a felony by the licensee or principal of the licensee
or any crime involving fraud, theft, or deceit; AND
(x) denial, suspension, or revocation of or refusal to renew a license
by any State or federal authority[; and
(xi) commission of any of the acts described in items (i) through (x) of
this paragraph by a person that is an affiliate of the licensee or that is under common
control with the licensee].
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A GAS SUPPLIER OR AN
ENERGY VENDOR WITH DUE PROCESS BEFORE TAKING ANY ACTION TO SUSPEND OR
REVOKE A LICENSE.
(b) (1) [(i)] A gas supplier, an energy vendor, or any other person[, except
for an energy salesperson,] selling or offering to sell gas in the State in violation of this
section or § 7–603 of this subtitle, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, is subject
to:
[1.] (I) a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for the
violation;
[2.] (II) license denial, revocation, or suspension or refusal
to renew the license; or
[3.] (III) both.
[(ii) An energy salesperson selling or offering to sell gas in the State
in violation of this section or § 7–603 of this subtitle, after notice and an opportunity for a
hearing, is subject to license denial, revocation, or suspension or refusal to renew the
license.]
(2) Each day [or part of a day] a violation continues is a separate violation.
(3) Each customer to whom gas is sold or offered in violation of this section
is a separate violation.
(4) The Commission shall determine the amount of any civil penalty after
considering:
(i) the number of previous violations of any provision of this division
by the gas supplier, energy vendor, or other person;
(ii) the gravity of the current violation;

HOUSE BILL 1443
(iii) the good faith of the gas supplier, energy vendor, or other person
charged in attempting to achieve compliance after notification of the violation; and
(iv) any other matter that the Commission considers appropriate and
relevant.
[(5) The Commission may not impose a civil penalty on an individual energy
salesperson in accordance with this subsection.]
(c) In connection with a consumer complaint or Commission investigation under
this section or § 7–603 of this subtitle, a gas supplier, [an energy salesperson,] an energy
vendor, and any other person selling or offering to sell gas in the State shall provide to the
Commission access to any accounts, books, papers, and documents that the Commission
considers necessary to resolve the matter at issue.
(d) The Commission may order the gas supplier, [energy salesperson,] an energy
vendor, or other person to cease adding or soliciting additional customers or to cease serving
customers in the State.
7–604.
(a) On or before July 1, 2001, the Commission shall adopt consumer protection
orders or regulations for gas suppliers[, energy salespersons,] and energy vendors that:
(1) protect consumers from discriminatory, unfair, deceptive, and
anticompetitive acts and practices in the marketing, selling, or distributing of natural gas;
(2) provide for contracting, enrollment, and billing practices and
procedures;
(3) REQUIRE EACH GAS SUPPLIER, WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER ADDING
OR REMOVING AN ENERGY VENDOR, TO SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A LIST OF ALL
ENERGY VENDORS CONDUCTING SALES ACTIVITIES ON BEHALF OF THE GAS
SUPPLIER; and
[(3)] (4) the Commission considers necessary to protect the consumer.
(b) In adopting orders and regulations under this section, unless the Commission
determines that the circumstances do not require consistency, the Commission shall:
(1) provide customers with protections consistent with applicable
protections provided to retail electric customers; and
(2) impose appropriate requirements on gas suppliers[, energy
salespersons,] and energy vendors that are consistent with applicable requirements
imposed on electricity suppliers[, energy salespersons,] and energy vendors.

HOUSE BILL 1443 19
7–604.2.
(a) In this section, “default gas commodity service” means the supply of retail gas
commodity service by a customer’s gas company.
(b) (1) This subsection applies to residential gas supply other than default gas
commodity service provided by a gas company.
(2) A gas supplier that supplies gas to residential retail gas customers:
(i) may offer gas service only at a price that does not exceed the
trailing 12–month average of the gas company’s default gas commodity service in the gas
company’s service territory as of the date of the agreement with the customer;
(ii) may offer residential gas supply only for a term not to exceed 12
months at a time and may automatically renew the term only if the gas supplier provides
notice to the customer 90 days before and 30 days before renewal; AND
(iii) subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, may not offer a
variable rate other than a rate that adjusts for seasonal variation not more than twice in a
single year[; and
(iv) may not pay a commission or other incentive–based
compensation to an energy salesperson for enrolling customers].
(3) Paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection does not prohibit the offer and use
of rates that differ based on the total number of therms used by a customer in any billing
period.
(4) A gas supplier that supplies gas to residential retail gas customers may
not sell to a gas company, and a gas company may not purchase from the gas supplier,
accounts receivable.
7–605.
(a) This subtitle may not be construed to:
(1) affect the authority of the Division of Consumer Protection of the Office
of the Attorney General to enforce violations of Titles 13 and 14 of the Commercial Law
Article or any other applicable State law or regulation in connection with the activities of
gas suppliers[, energy salespersons,] or energy vendors; or
(2) exempt gas companies, gas suppliers, [energy salespersons,] and
energy vendors from otherwise applicable State or federal consumer protection and
antitrust laws.

HOUSE BILL 1443
(b) The Commission shall consult with the Consumer Protection Division of the
Office of the Attorney General before adopting regulations designed to protect consumers
of gas supply and gas supply services.
(c) The People’s Counsel has the same authority in licensing, complaint, and
dispute resolution proceedings as the People’s Counsel has under Subtitle 5 of this title and
Title 2 of this article.
(d) In connection with a consumer complaint or Commission investigation under
this subtitle, a gas supplier[, an energy salesperson,] or an energy vendor shall provide to
the Commission access to any accounts, books, papers, and documents that the Commission
considers necessary to resolve a matter in dispute.
13–201.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a civil
penalty collected under this section shall be paid into the Resiliency Hub Grant Program
Fund established under § 9–2011 of the State Government Article.
(2) A civil penalty assessed for a violation of a service quality and reliability
standard under § 7–213 of this article shall be paid into the Electric Reliability Remediation
Fund under § 7–213(j) of this article.
(3) A civil penalty assessed for a violation of [§ 7–317,] § 7–318, §
7–505(b)(7), § 7–507, § 7–603, § 7–603.1, § 7–604, OR § 7–606[, or § 7–707] of this article,
or a rule, an order, or a regulation adopted under any of those sections, shall be paid into
the Education and Protection Fund under § 7–310 of this article.
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) the licenses of electricity suppliers and gas suppliers that are licensed
by the Public Service Commission as of July 1, 2024, shall expire on a staggered basis as
determined by the Commission, such that equal numbers of licenses shall expire
throughout each of the following 3 years but not later than June 30, 2027; AND
(2) [the licenses of energy salespersons who are licensed by the
Commission on or before June 30, 2027, shall expire on a staggered basis as determined by
the Commission, such that equal numbers of licenses shall expire each year; and
(3)] all new and renewed licenses for electricity suppliers[,] AND gas
suppliers[, and energy salespersons] shall be for a term not exceeding 3 years.
[SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31,
2024, the Public Service Commission shall:

HOUSE BILL 1443 21
(1) in accordance with § 7–311 of the Public Utilities Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act, develop a training and education program for any entity or individual
that is licensed by the Commission as an electricity supplier, a gas supplier, an energy
salesperson, or an energy vendor; and
(2) in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, report to
the General Assembly on the status of the development of the training and education
program required under § 7–311 of the Public Utilities Article, as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act.]
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.